incubator/apertium-ku-fa.ku.dix
    <pardef n="/bûn__vbcop">

      <!-- Post-consonantal -->
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p> 
          <l>im</l>
          <r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p> 
          <l>î</l>
          <r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p> 
          <l>e</l>
          <r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p> 
          <l>in</l>
          <r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p> 
          <l>in</l>
          <r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p> 
          <l>in</l>
          <r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <!-- Post-vocalic -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p> 
          <l>me</l>
          <r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="LR">
        <p> 
          <l>yî</l>
          <r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="LR">
        <p> 
          <l>ye</l>
          <r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="LR">
        <p> 
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ne</l>
          <r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>


      <e r="RL">
        <p> 
          <l><a/>im</l>
          <r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="RL">
        <p> 
          <l><a/>î</l>
          <r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="RL">
        <p> 
          <l><a/>e</l>
          <r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="RL">
        <p> 
          <l><a/>in</l>
          <r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>in</l>
          <r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>in</l>
          <r>bûn<s n="vbcop"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>




    <!-- Nouns -->

    <pardef n="xan/î__n">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>î</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>î</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyê</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>o</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyek</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyekî</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyekî</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>î</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyan</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyên</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyên</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyin</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyinan</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyine</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyî</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>iyan</l>
          <r>î<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="perç/e__n">
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyê</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p> 
          <l>ê</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>o</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyek</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyeke</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyekî</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyan</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyên</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e r="LR"> 
        <p> 
          <l>ên</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyên</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/><s n="def"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyin</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyinan</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyine</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="con"/><s n="ind"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 

      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyî</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
      <e> 
        <p> 
          <l>eyan</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/><s n="dem"/></r>
        </p> 
      </e> 
    </pardef>

    <e lm="bûn"><i/><par n="/bûn__vbcop"/></e>
    <e lm="xanî"><i>xan</i><par n="xan/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="perçe"><i>perç</i><par n="perç/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mele"><i>mel</i><par n="perç/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alî"><i>al</i><par n="xan/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="derî"><i>der</i><par n="xan/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="masî"><i>mas</i><par n="xan/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pêncî"><i>pênc</i><par n="xan/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rovî"><i>rov</i><par n="xan/î__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sî"><i>s</i><par n="xan/î__n"/></e>
